Utah statutes.
10-5-109.   Adoption of budgets -- Filing.

Prior to June 22 of each year, or August 17 in the case of a property tax increase under Sections 59-2-919 through 59-2-923, the council shall by resolution or ordinance adopt a budget for the ensuing fiscal year for each fund for which a budget is required under this chapter.  A copy of the final budget for each fund shall be filed with the state auditor within 30 days after adoption.



Amended by Chapter 118, 1989 General Session

